Washington statutes.
RCW 19.58.050

Violation—Civil suit—Attorneys' fees.

Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action in superior court to enjoin further violations or to recover the actual damages sustained, or both, together with the costs of the suit. In any such action, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees to the prevailing party.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 29 s 5.]